California statutes. Education Code
(d) The collaborative’s mission is to ensure that genocide, including Holocaust, education is taught consistent with the current content standards, curriculum frameworks, and instructional materials adopted by the state board, and any
 other requirements of this code, including, but not limited to, Sections 51204.5 and 60040, in ways that are interdisciplinary and age-appropriate to pupils of different grade levels.

(e) In addition to focusing on education regarding the Holocaust and other genocides, including, but not limited to, those of the Armenian, Bosnian, Cambodian, Guatemalan, Indigenous American, Rwandan, and Uyghur peoples, the collaborative shall focus on education to identify and confront antisemitism and hate in modern society.

(f) The duties of the collaborative shall include, but are not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Developing and providing curriculum resources on genocide and Holocaust education.

(2) Providing a statewide teacher professional development
 program on genocide and Holocaust education.

(g) Subject to available funding, the collaborative duties may include all of the following:

(1) Distributing grants to genocide and Holocaust education organizations and institutions to provide teacher training programs, and developing innovative academic standards-based curricula and digital tools, consistent with the purposes of this section.

(2) Creating a robust digital library of lesson plans and resources on genocide, including Holocaust, education that align with the academic standards, distributing these lesson plans to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools statewide, and supporting teachers with the successful implementation of the lesson plans through workshops, conferences, and digital tools.

(3) Organizing statewide and regional workshops, and providing participating teachers with transportation and accommodation.

(4) Launching and maintaining an internet website that serves as a central hub for sharing the latest educational resources, including curricula and other materials, and best practices on genocide education to provide access to all California teachers of pupils in any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, and increasing the use of high-quality resources, in school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools.

(5) Evaluating the implementation and administration of this section annually to assess whether teaching about genocide, including the Holocaust, has improved, and whether the mission of the collaborative, as described in subdivision (d), has been met.

(6) Providing, as determined by the department, annual verbal or written reports to the department and the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the collaborative’s achievement of its mission, as described in subdivision (d).

(h) The implementation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 890, Sec. 2.   (SB 1277)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

51221.2.

(a) (1) The department shall issue a notice to all local educational agencies serving pupils in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, clarifying that social science instruction provided pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51220 is designed to provide a foundation for the understanding of human rights issues with particular attention to the study of the inhumanity of genocide, slavery, and the Holocaust. In furtherance of this instruction, the notice shall advise these local educational agencies of all of the following:

(A) Holocaust and genocide education are part of the adopted History-Social Science Content Standards and Framework adopted by the state board.

(B) The
 History-Social Science Framework adopted by the state board provides information about instruction on the Holocaust and genocide.

(2) The department shall include, within the notice described in paragraph (1), information about the existing resources available to support local educational agencies and teachers in the instruction of Holocaust and genocide education.

(3) The department is authorized to issue a survey to local educational agencies, no more than two years after these local educational agencies are issued the notice described in paragraph (1), on the status of Holocaust and genocide instruction at their schools.

(b) (1) The Holocaust and Genocide Education Grant
 Program is hereby established and shall be administered by the California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education
 to provide direct allocations to local educational agencies for the purposes of providing Holocaust and genocide education and professional development on Holocaust and genocide education.

(2) Grants provided under the grant program shall be used to provide resources and opportunities related to Holocaust and genocide education, which may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Providing instructional
 resources on topics about the Holocaust and genocide.

(B) Hosting an event or an organization at a schoolsite maintained by the local educational agency for purposes related to Holocaust or genocide education.

(C) Financing teacher attendance at professional development opportunities focused on Holocaust and genocide education.

(D) Hiring substitute teachers to support teacher attendance at professional development opportunities focused on Holocaust and genocide education.

(E) Financing staff time to plan and facilitate local educational agency or school-based programs related to Holocaust and genocide education.

(F) Financing transportation to events and educational opportunities related to Holocaust and genocide education.

(3) The California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education shall adopt
 policies and guidelines for the grant program, which shall include, but not be limited to, programmatic details, application criteria and deadlines, and reporting requirements on how allocations were spent. The California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education shall consult with the department in developing the policies and guidelines.

(c) The Holocaust and Genocide Education Grant Program Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.
 Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the fund shall be directed to the Marin County Office of Education for distribution to the California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education. The California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education shall use these moneys for administering and implementing the grant program established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) The California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education shall provide, as determined by the department, annual written reports to the department and the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the administration of the grant program established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education” means the collaborative established in Section 51221.1.

(2) “Genocide” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51221.1.

(3) “Holocaust” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51221.1.

(4) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 101.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51221.3.

(a) Instruction in the area of social sciences, as required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51220, may include instruction on World War II and the American role in that war. The Legislature encourages this instruction to include, but not be limited to, a component drawn from personal testimony, especially in the form of oral or video histories, if available, of American soldiers who were involved in World War II and those men and women who contributed to the war effort on the homefront. The oral histories used as part of the instruction regarding World War II shall exemplify the personal sacrifice and courage of the wide range of ordinary citizens who were called upon to participate. The oral histories shall contain the views and comments of
 their subjects regarding the reasons for American participation in World War II and the actions taken to end the war in the Pacific. These oral histories shall also solicit comments from their subjects regarding the aftermath of World War II in Eastern Europe and the former Soviet Union.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the current state-adopted academic content standards already include instruction on the Korean War and the Vietnam War in the appropriate grade level consistent with those standards. The Legislature encourages that this instruction include a component drawn from personal testimony, especially in the form of oral or video histories, if available, of American soldiers who were involved in those wars.

(c) (1) The Legislature
 encourages the instruction required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51220 to include instruction on World War II and the role of Filipinos in that war, consisting of an accurate history of the contributions of the Filipino American veterans who fought courageously in the United States Army for freedom and democracy in World War II under the leadership of General Douglas MacArthur.

(2) The Legislature encourages the instruction described in paragraph (1) to include a component drawn from personal testimony, especially in the form of oral or video histories of Filipinos who were involved in World War II and those men and women who contributed to the war effort on the homefront. The oral histories used as a part of the instruction regarding the role of Filipinos in World War II are encouraged to do all of the following:

(A) Exemplify the personal sacrifice and courage of the wide range of ordinary citizens who were called upon to participate and to provide intelligence for the United States.

(B) Contain the views and comments of their subjects regarding the reasons for their participation in World War II.

(C) Solicit comments from their subjects regarding the aftermath of World War II and the immigration of Filipinos to the United States.

(d) (1) Instruction in the area of social sciences, as required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51220, may include instruction on the Bracero program.

(2) The instruction described in paragraph (1) may include a component drawn from personal testimony, especially in the form of oral or video histories of individuals who were involved with the Bracero program. Oral histories used as part of the instruction regarding the Bracero program may do all of the following:

(A) Exemplify the economic and cultural effects of the Bracero program during and after World War II, including, but not limited to, its effects on the railroad system, agriculture, and immigration in California and the United States of America.

(B) Contain the views and comments of their subjects regarding the reasons for their participation in the Bracero program and their
 immigrant story, generally.

(3) This subdivision shall be carried out in a manner that does not result in new duties or programs being imposed on a school district. In that regard, the Legislature finds and declares that this subdivision does not mandate costs to local agencies or school districts and that materials used to comply with this subdivision shall be part of normal curriculum materials purchased by school districts in their normal course of business and purchasing cycles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   (SB 993)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

51221.4.

(a) The Legislature encourages instruction in the area of social sciences, as required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 51220, which may include instruction on the Vietnam war including the “Secret War” in Laos and the role of Southeast Asians in that war. The Legislature encourages that this instruction include, but not be limited to, a component drawn from personal testimony, especially in the form of oral or video history of Southeast Asians who were involved in the Vietnam war and those men and women who contributed to the war effort on the homefront. The oral histories used as a part of the instruction regarding the role of Southeast Asians in the Vietnam war and the “Secret War” in Laos shall exemplify the personal sacrifice and courage of the wide range of ordinary citizens who were called upon to participate and provide intelligence for the United States. The oral histories shall contain the views and comments of their subjects regarding the reasons for their participation in the war. These oral histories shall also solicit comments from their subjects regarding the aftermath of the war and the immigration of Southeast Asians to the United States.

(b) This section shall be carried out in a manner that does not result in any new duties or programs being imposed on the school district. In that regard, the Legislature finds and declares that this section does not mandate costs to local agencies or school districts and that materials used to comply with this section shall be part of normal curriculum materials purchased by school districts in their normal course of business and purchasing cycles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

51221.5.

For the purposes of this code, the phrase “vocational-technical education” shall have the same meaning as “career technical education” as described in subdivision (i) of Section 51220.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 988, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

51222.

(a) All pupils, except pupils excused or exempted pursuant to Section 51241, shall be required to attend upon the courses of physical education for a total period of time of not less than 400 minutes each 10 schooldays, except as provided in subdivision (c). Any pupil may be excused from physical education classes during one of grades 10, 11, or 12 for not to exceed 24 clock hours in order to participate in automobile driver training. A pupil who is excused from physical education classes to enroll in driver training shall attend upon a minimum of 7,000 minutes of physical education instruction during such school year.

(b) The governing board of each school district that maintains a high school and that elects to exempt pupils from required attendance in physical
 education courses pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) or both of subdivision (b) of Section 51241 shall offer those pupils so exempted a variety of elective physical education courses of not less than 400 minutes each 10 schooldays.

(c) The governing board of a school district that maintains any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, may adopt a policy providing for an alternate term schedule for physical education courses, which shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of a course in physical education for purposes of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) (A) For a pupil in grade 6, the pupil receives no less than 400 minutes of instruction every 10 schooldays for a semester of not fewer than 18 weeks during the regular school year, for a total of 3,600 instructional minutes for the
 school year.

(B) For a pupil in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, the pupil receives no less than 800 minutes of instruction every 10 schooldays for a semester of not fewer than 18 weeks during the regular school year, for a total of 7,200 instructional minutes for the school year.

(2) The physical education program is aligned with the physical education framework adopted by the state board in that it provides a sequential, articulated, age-appropriate program.

(3) The physical education program complies with the course of study requirements of high school physical education programs specified in Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 10060) of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 10 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable.

(4) Pupils
 are prepared for, and participate in, the physical performance testing required pursuant to Section 60800.

(d) (1) A complaint that a school district or county superintendent of schools has not complied with the instructional minute requirements of subdivision (a) or (c) may be filed with a school district or county superintendent of schools pursuant to the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a school district or county superintendent of schools may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written appeal decision within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the
 appeal.

(3) If a school district or county superintendent of schools finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the school district or county superintendent of schools shall provide a remedy to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that neither the original provisions of this section, nor any subsequent amendments to it, were intended to create a private right of action. However, nothing in this subdivision shall restrict or expand the existing right of any party to seek relief from noncompliance with this section pursuant to a writ of mandate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 88, Sec. 5.   (AB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51223.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 51210 and 51222, instruction in physical education in an elementary school maintaining any of grades 1 to 8, inclusive, shall be for a total period of time of not less than 200 minutes each 10 
 schooldays, exclusive of recesses and the lunch period.

(b) (1) A complaint that a school district or county superintendent of schools has not complied with the instructional minute requirements of subdivision (a) may be filed with a school district or county superintendent of schools pursuant to the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a school district or county superintendent of schools may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written appeal decision
 within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(3) If a school district or county superintendent of schools finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the school district or county superintendent of schools shall provide a remedy to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that neither the original provisions of this section, nor any subsequent amendments to it, were intended to create a private right of action. However, nothing in this subdivision shall restrict or expand the existing right of any party to seek relief from noncompliance with this section pursuant to a writ of mandate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 706, Sec. 2.   (AB 1391)   Effective October 9, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

51223.3.

(a) During the first revision of the physical education framework that occurs on or after January 1, 2011, the state board and the Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission shall include self-defense instruction and safety instruction in that framework for pupils in grades 7, 8, 9, 11, and 12.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Safety instruction” includes, but is not necessarily limited to, awareness and avoidance of potentially dangerous situations.

(2) “Self-defense instruction” includes, but is not necessarily limited to, martial arts, boxing, and other defensive
 techniques.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 69.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

51224.

The governing board of any school district maintaining a high school shall prescribe courses of study designed to provide the skills and knowledge required for adult life for pupils attending the schools within its school district. The governing board shall prescribe separate courses of study, including, but not limited to, a course of study designed to prepare prospective pupils for admission to state colleges and universities and a course of study for career technical training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

51224.5.

(a) The adopted course of study for grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall include algebra as part of the mathematics area of study pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 51220.

(b) Before receiving a diploma of graduation from high school, a pupil shall complete at least one course, or a combination of the two courses required for graduation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3, that meets or exceeds the rigor of Algebra I or Mathematics I, that is aligned to the content standards adopted by the state board pursuant to Sections 60605.8 and 60605.11.

(c) A pupil who, before
 enrollment in grade 9, completes a course in Algebra I or Mathematics I, or mathematics courses of equal rigor, that is aligned to the content standards adopted by the state board, is exempt from subdivision (b), but is not exempt from the requirement that the pupil complete two courses in mathematics while enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51225.3.

(d) A pupil who has completed a course or courses that meet or exceed the content standards for Algebra I adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60605, as that section read on June 30, 2011, shall be deemed to have satisfied the graduation requirement specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   (AB 220)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51224.7.

(a) This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Mathematics Placement Act of 2015.

(b) Governing boards or bodies of local educational agencies that serve pupils entering grade 9 and that have not adopted a fair, objective, and transparent mathematics placement policy, as described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, as of January 1, 2016, shall, before the beginning of the 2016–17 school year, develop and adopt, in a regularly scheduled public meeting, a fair, objective,
 and transparent mathematics placement policy for pupils entering grade 9 that does all of the following:

(1) Systematically takes multiple objective academic measures of pupil performance into consideration. For purposes of this paragraph, “objective academic measures” means measures, such as statewide mathematics assessments, including interim and summative assessments authorized pursuant to Section 60640, placement tests that are aligned to state-adopted content standards in mathematics, classroom assignment and grades, and report cards.

(2) Includes at least one placement checkpoint within the first month of the school year to ensure accurate placement and permit reevaluation of individual pupil progress.

(3) Requires examination of aggregate pupil placement data annually to ensure that pupils who are qualified to progress in mathematics courses based on their performance on objective academic measures selected for inclusion in the policy pursuant to paragraph (1) are not held back in a disproportionate manner on the basis of their race, ethnicity, gender, or socioeconomic background. The local educational agency shall report the aggregate results of this examination to the governing board or body of the local educational agency.

(4) Offers clear and timely recourse for each pupil and his or her parent or legal guardian who questions the pupil’s placement.

(5) For nonunified school districts, addresses the consistency of mathematics placement policies between
 elementary and high school districts.

(c) Governing boards or bodies of local educational agencies serving pupils who are transitioning between elementary and middle school or elementary and junior high school may develop and implement a mathematics placement policy for these pupils, as applicable, that satisfies paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(d) Each governing board or body of a local educational agency shall ensure that its mathematics placement policy is posted on its Internet Web site.

(e) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means county office of education, school district, state special school, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 508, Sec. 2.   (SB 359)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Governing body” means the governing board of a school district, the governing body of a charter school, or a county board of education, as applicable.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall do both of the following:

(1) Exempt a pupil who was enrolled in the pupil’s third or fourth
 year of high school during the 2020–21 school year and who is not on track to graduate in four years from all coursework and other requirements adopted by the governing body that are in addition to the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3.

(2) Provide a pupil who was enrolled in the pupil’s third or fourth year of high school during the 2020–21 school year, and who is not on track to graduate in the 2020–21 or 2021–22 school years, the opportunity to complete the statewide coursework required for graduation pursuant to Section 51225.3, which opportunity may include, but is not limited to, completion of the coursework through a fifth year of instruction, credit recovery, or other opportunity to complete the required coursework.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 41, Sec. 3.   (AB 104)   Effective July 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

51225.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency, as defined in subdivision (t), shall exempt a pupil in foster care, as defined in subdivision (t), a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, as defined in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a former juvenile court school pupil, as defined in Section 51225.2, a pupil who is a child of a military family, as defined in Section 49701, or a pupil who is a migratory child, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 54441, who transfers between schools any time after the completion of the pupil’s second year of high school, or a newcomer pupil, as defined in Section 51225.2, and who is in their third or fourth year of high school, from all coursework and other
 requirements adopted by the governing body that are in addition to the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3, unless the local educational agency makes a finding that the pupil is reasonably able to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements in time to graduate from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school.

(b) If the local educational agency determines that the pupil in foster care, the pupil who is a homeless child or youth, the former juvenile court school pupil, the pupil who is a child of a military family, the pupil who is a migratory child, or the newcomer pupil is reasonably able to complete the local educational agency’s
 graduation requirements within the pupil’s fifth year of high school, the local educational agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Consult with the pupil and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil regarding the pupil’s option to remain in school for a fifth year to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements.

(2) Consult with the pupil, and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, about how remaining in school for a fifth year to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements will affect the pupil’s ability to gain admission to a postsecondary educational institution.

(3) Consult with and provide information
 to the pupil about transfer opportunities available through the California Community Colleges.

(4) Permit the pupil to stay in school for a fifth year to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements upon agreement with the pupil, if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, or, if the pupil is under 18 years of age, upon agreement with the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil.

(5) For a pupil in foster care or a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, consult with the pupil, and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, regarding the pupil’s option to remain in the pupil’s school of origin, pursuant to Section 48852.7 for a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, or Section 48853.5 for a
 pupil in foster care.

(c) To determine whether a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, or a pupil who is a migratory child is in the third or fourth year of high school, the number of credits the pupil has earned to the date of transfer, the length of the pupil’s school enrollment, or, for pupils with significant gaps in school attendance, the pupil’s age as compared to the average age of pupils in the third or fourth year of high school, may be used, whichever will qualify the pupil for the exemption. In the case of a newcomer pupil, enrollment in grade 11 or 12, based on the average age of pupils in the third or fourth year of high school, may be used to determine whether the pupil is in the pupil’s third or fourth year of high
 school.

(d) (1) (A) Within 30 calendar days of the date that a pupil in foster care who may qualify for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section transfers into a school, the local educational agency shall notify the pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, and the pupil’s social worker or probation officer of the availability of the exemption and whether the pupil qualifies for an exemption.

(B) If the local educational agency fails to provide timely notice pursuant to subparagraph (A), the pupil described in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section once notified, even if that notification
 occurs after the termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the pupil, if the pupil otherwise qualifies for the exemption pursuant to this section.

(2) (A) Within 30 calendar days of the date that a pupil who is a homeless child or youth who may qualify for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section transfers into a school, the local educational agency shall notify the pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, and the local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youth designated pursuant to Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) of Title 42 of the United States Code, of the availability of the exemption and whether the pupil qualifies for an exemption.

(B) If the local educational
 agency fails to provide timely notice pursuant to subparagraph (A), the pupil described in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section once notified, even if that notification occurs after the pupil is no longer a homeless child or youth, if the pupil otherwise qualifies for the exemption pursuant to this section.

(3) (A) Within 30 calendar days of the date that a former juvenile court school pupil who may qualify for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section transfers into a school, the local educational agency shall notify the pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, and the pupil’s social worker or probation officer of the availability of the exemption and whether the pupil qualifies
 for an exemption.

(B) If the local educational agency fails to provide timely notice pursuant to subparagraph (A), the pupil described in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section once notified, even if that notification occurs after termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the pupil, if the pupil otherwise qualifies for the exemption pursuant to this section.

(4) (A) Within 30 calendar days of the date that a pupil who is a child of a military family who may qualify for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section transfers into a school, the local educational agency shall notify the pupil and the pupil’s parent or guardian of the availability of the
 exemption and whether the pupil qualifies for an exemption.

(B) If the local educational agency fails to provide timely notice pursuant to subparagraph (A), the pupil described in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section once notified, even if that notification occurs after the pupil no longer meets the definition of “children of military families” under Section 49701, if the pupil otherwise qualifies for the exemption pursuant to this section.

(5) (A) Within 30 calendar days of the date that a pupil who is a migratory child who may qualify for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section transfers into a school, the local educational agency shall notify the pupil and the pupil’s
 parent or guardian of the availability of the exemption and whether the pupil qualifies for an exemption.

(B) If the local educational agency fails to provide timely notice pursuant to subparagraph (A), the pupil described in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section once notified, even if that notification occurs after the pupil no longer meets the definition of “migratory child” if the pupil otherwise qualifies for the exemption pursuant to this section.

(6) (A) Within 30 calendar days of the date that a newcomer pupil who may qualify for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section transfers into a school, the local educational agency shall notify the pupil and
 the pupil’s parent or guardian of the availability of the exemption and whether the pupil qualifies for an exemption.

(B) If the local educational agency fails to provide timely notice pursuant to subparagraph (A), the pupil described in subparagraph (A) shall be eligible for the exemption from local graduation
 requirements pursuant to this section once notified, even if that notification occurs after the pupil no longer meets the definition of a “newcomer pupil” if the pupil otherwise qualifies for the exemption pursuant to this section.

(e) If a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section and completes the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3 before the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school and that pupil would otherwise be entitled to remain in attendance at the school, a school, including a charter school, or school district shall not require or request that the pupil
 graduate before the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school.

(f) If a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil is exempted from local graduation requirements pursuant to this section, in addition to providing notification of the exemption pursuant to subdivision (d), the local educational agency shall consult with the pupil and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil. The consultation shall include all of the following:

(1) Discussion regarding how any of the requirements that are waived may affect the pupil’s postsecondary education or vocation plans, including the ability to gain
 admission to a postsecondary educational institution.

(2) Discussion and information about other options available to the pupil, including, but not limited to, a fifth year of high school, possible credit recovery, and any transfer opportunities available through the California Community Colleges.

(3) Consideration of the pupil’s academic data and any other information relevant to making an informed decision on whether to accept the exemption.

(g) A pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil who is eligible for the exemption from local graduation requirements
 pursuant to this section and would otherwise be entitled to remain in attendance at the school shall not be required to accept the exemption or be denied enrollment in, or the ability to complete, courses for which the pupil is otherwise eligible, including courses necessary to attend an institution of higher education, regardless of whether those courses are required for statewide graduation requirements.

(h) (1) If a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil is not exempted from local graduation requirements or has previously declined the exemption pursuant to this section, a local educational agency shall exempt the pupil within 30 days of the date of the
 exemption request, if an exemption is requested by the pupil or the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil and the pupil qualifies for the exemption.

(2) If a pupil in foster care, a pupil who is a homeless child or youth, a former juvenile court school pupil, a pupil who is a child of a military family, a pupil who is a migratory child, or a newcomer pupil who was eligible for an exemption pursuant to this section, was not properly notified of the availability of the exemption pursuant to subdivision (d), or declined the exemption, a local educational agency nonetheless shall exempt the pupil within 30 days of the date of the exemption request, if an exemption is requested by the pupil or the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, and the pupil at one time qualified for the